Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 1
COMMON PROVISIONS

35-36-101. Short title.

The short title of this article 36 is the "Commodity Handler and Farm Products Act".

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 715, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-36-101 and 35-37-101 as they existed prior to 2020.

35-36-102. Definitions - rules.

As used in this article 36, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Agent" means a person who, on behalf of a dealer or small-volume dealer, buys, receives, contracts for, or solicits any farm products from or sells farm products for the owner of the farm products or who negotiates the consignment or purchase of any farm products on behalf of a dealer or small-volume dealer.

"Bailee" means a person who, by a negotiable warehouse receipt or other document of title, acknowledges possession of goods and contracts to deliver them.

"Bailment" means the act of delivering goods or personal property to another in trust.

"Commercial feeding" means the feeding of livestock by a person who receives compensation from the owner of the livestock for the feeding.

"Commission" means the state agricultural commission created in section 35-1-105.

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's designee.

"Commodity" means unprocessed small, hard seeds or fruits such as wheat, corn, oats, barley, rye, sunflower seeds, soybeans, beans, grain sorghum, industrial hemp, and such other seeds or fruits as the commissioner may determine.

"Commodity handler" means a person:

Engaged in buying any commodities from the owner for processing or resale;

Engaged in receiving and taking possession of any commodities from the owner for storage or safekeeping;

Engaged in soliciting or negotiating sales of commodities between the vendor and purchaser respectively;

Who receives on consignment or solicits from the owner of a commodity any kind of commodity for sale on commission on behalf of the owner, who accepts any commodity in trust from the owner of the commodity for the purpose of resale, or who sells or offers for sale on commission any commodity or in any way handles any commodity for the account of the owner of the commodity; or

Engaged in buying any commodity from the owner of the commodity for the commercial feeding of livestock that are owned wholly or in part by another, at an animal feeding operation with a capacity of more than two thousand five hundred head of livestock.

"Commodity handler" does not include:

A bona fide retail grocery merchant or restaurateur having a fixed or established place of business in Colorado if the use of commodities by the person is directly related to the operation of the person's retail grocery or restaurant; or

A producer as defined in the "Colorado Cottage Foods Act", section 25-4-1614 (9)(c), who earns net revenues of ten thousand dollars or less per calendar year from the sale of each eligible food product.

Engaged in soliciting or negotiating sales of farm products between the vendor and purchaser respectively;

Who receives on consignment or solicits from the owner of a farm product any kind of farm product for sale on commission on behalf of the owner, who accepts any farm product in trust from the owner of the farm product for the purpose of resale, or who sells or offers for sale on commission any farm product or in any way handles any farm product for the account of, or as an agent of, the owner of the farm product; or

Engaged in buying any farm products or commodities from the owner of the farm products or commodities for the commercial feeding of livestock that are owned wholly or in part by another, at an animal feeding operation with a capacity of more than two thousand five hundred head of livestock.

"Compensation" means something of value or benefit, whether in cash, in kind, or in any other form.

"Consignor" includes a person who ships or delivers to a dealer or small-volume dealer any farm products for handling, sale, or resale.

"Credit sale contract" means a contract for the sale of a commodity or a farm product when the sale price is to be paid on a date later than thirty days after delivery of the commodity or farm product to the buyer and includes those contracts commonly referred to as deferred payment contracts, deferred pricing contracts, and price later contracts.

"Dealer" means a person:

(I) Engaged in buying any farm products from the owner for processing or resale;

(II) Engaged in receiving and taking possession of any farm products from the owner for storage or safekeeping;

"Dealer" does not include:

A bona fide retail grocery merchant or restaurateur having a fixed or established place of business in Colorado if the use of farm products by the person is directly related to the operation of the person's retail grocery or restaurant; or

A producer as defined in the "Colorado Cottage Foods Act", section 25-4-1614 (9)(c), who earns net revenues of ten thousand dollars or less per calendar year from the sale of each eligible food product.

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Farm products" includes the following unprocessed products produced in Colorado or owned by any Colorado resident, dealer, or small-volume dealer:
(14) (a) (I) "Farm products" includes the following unprocessed products produced in Colorado or owned by any Colorado resident, dealer, or small-volume dealer:

Agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, fruit, and vegetable products of the soil;

Livestock and livestock products, except livestock held by the purchaser and not resold or processed within ninety days after the purchase date;

Milk; and

Honey.

"Farm products" also includes:

Ensiled corn;

Baled, cubed, or ground hay; and

Industrial hemp.

"Farm products" does not include poultry and poultry products, timber products, nursery stock, commodities, or marijuana.

"Financial statement" means a statement prepared according to generally accepted accounting principles that accurately presents the financial condition of an applicant or licensee and that includes, at a minimum, a balance sheet and a statement of income.

"Forwarded commodities" means commodities sent to a terminal warehouse and put on open storage in the name of the forwarding warehouse operator.

"Handling" means buying commodities for resale or processing, brokering commodities, or receiving and loading out commodities tendered for storage.

"Industrial hemp" has the meaning set forth in section 35-61-101 (7).

"Livestock" has the meaning set forth in section 35-1-102 (6).

"Loss" means any monetary loss to a producer or owner that is of an extraordinary nature and that includes but is not limited to, bankruptcy, embezzlement, theft, fraud, or negligence.

"Marijuana" has the meaning set forth in section 16 (2)(f) of article XVIII of the Colorado constitution.

"Market value" means the value required by law to be used by insurance underwriters in paying for losses of commodities insured for their actual value.

"Negotiable warehouse receipt" means a receipt that specifies by its terms that the goods are to be delivered to the bearer or to the order of a named person. Any other receipt is nonnegotiable.

"Owner" means any person in whom legal title to any commodity or farm product is vested, whether produced by the owner or acquired by purchase.

"Person" includes:

An individual, firm, association, partnership, or corporation; or

The commissioner.

"Processing" means the operation of canning, drying, fermenting, distilling, extracting, preserving, grinding, crushing, flaking, mixing, or otherwise changing the form of a commodity or farm product for the purpose of selling or reselling any of the resulting products.

"Producer" means a person engaged in growing commodities or farm products or producing farm products.

"Provisional insurance coverage" means a certificate or any other satisfactory evidence of fire and extended coverage insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state insuring every commodity in the custody of a warehouse operator, whether held for others or owned by the warehouse operator, at the full local market value of each commodity.

"Public warehouse" includes an elevator, mill, warehouse, or other structure in which commodities are received from one or more members of the public for storage.

"Retail grocery merchant" means a person whose sales consist of more than fifty percent nonfarm-product and noncommodity grocery household merchandise.

"Scale ticket" means a receipt issued for a commodity that names the person to whom it is issued and the kind and grade of the commodity stored.

"Settlement sheet" means a summary of a commodity handler's or small-volume commodity handler's transactions with an owner.

"Small-volume commodity handler" means a person who:

Has a fixed or established place of business in this state;

Engages in commodities handling;

Buys less than two hundred fifty thousand dollars' worth of commodities and farm products per year from owners for processing or resale; and

Does not purchase commodities for commercial feeding of livestock.

"Small-volume dealer" means a person who:

Does not qualify as a "dealer" under subsections (12)(a)(II) to (12)(a)(V) of this section;

Has a fixed or established place of business in Colorado;

Buys less than twenty thousand dollars' worth of farm products or commodities, in aggregate, per year from the owners for processing or resale; and

Does not purchase farm products for commercial feeding of livestock.

"Storage" means the holding of a commodity or farm product for another by a person who does not directly own the commodity or farm product. "Storage" does not include transportation of a commodity or farm product.

"Terminal warehouse" means a public warehouse licensed by the department, the United States department of agriculture, or any state that has a warehouse examination cooperative agreement with Colorado or the United States department of agriculture.

"Warehouse operator" includes a person owning, operating, or controlling a public warehouse.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 716, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-102 as it existed prior to 2020; except that subsection (1) is similar to former § 35-37-103 (1), subsection (12) is similar to former § 35-37-103 (7), subsection (14) is similar to former § 35-37-103 (8), subsection (21) is similar to former § 35-37-103 (9.5), subsection (30) is similar to former § 35-37-103 (14), and subsection (34) is similar to former § 35-37-103 (15) as they existed prior to 2020.

35-36-103. Commissioner - rules - delegation of powers and duties.

The commissioner shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24 as are necessary for the administration of this article 36. On or before December 31, 2020, the commissioner must promulgate rules that include rules regarding:

Financial assurance requirements, including a schedule for applicants to file a bond with the commissioner;

Requirements for maintaining records;

Initial and renewal license requirements;

Requirements for credit sale contracts;

Requirements for warehouse operations; and

The capacity of animal feeding operations for purposes of this article 36.

Repealed.

The commissioner is the enforcing authority of this article 36, and the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized representative has free and unimpeded access to all places of business and all business records of a licensee licensed under part 2 or part 3 of this article 36 that are pertinent to any proper inquiry in the administration of this article 36. Any person in whom the enforcement of this article 36 is vested has the power of a peace officer as to the enforcement.

The commissioner may delegate the commissioner's powers and duties set forth in this article 36 to qualified employees of the department.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 721, § 2, effective June 29.

35-36-104. Cease-and-desist order - restraining order.

If the commissioner determines that there exists a violation of this article 36 or of any rule promulgated under the authority of this article 36, the commissioner may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require a person to cease functioning as a commodity handler, small-volume commodity handler, dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent except for those functions necessary to prevent spoilage of products stored in the person's public warehouse or a dealer's warehouse or for the continued commercial feeding of livestock. The order must set forth the provision alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all functions, except those necessary to prevent spoilage or for the continued commercial feeding of livestock, cease immediately. At any time after the date of the service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request a hearing on the question of whether the violation has occurred. The hearing shall be concluded in not more than ten days after the request and shall be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24.

If a person fails to comply with a cease-and-desist order within twenty-four hours after service, the commissioner may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article 36 or any rule or order pursuant to this article 36. In the action, the commissioner is not required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of a remedy at law. The court shall not require the commissioner to post a bond.

A stay of a cease-and-desist order shall not be issued before a hearing on the order involving both parties.

Matters brought before a court pursuant to this section have preference over other matters on the court's calendar.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 722, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-36-120 and 35-37-109 as they existed prior to 2020.

35-36-105. Civil penalties.

A person who violates this article 36 or any rule enacted pursuant to this article 36 is subject to a civil penalty as determined by the commissioner. The maximum penalty is one thousand dollars per violation per day.

A civil penalty shall not be imposed unless the person charged is given notice and an opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24.

If the commissioner is unable to collect a civil penalty or if any person fails to pay all or any portion of a civil penalty, the commissioner may recover the amount, plus costs and attorney fees, by action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Under circumstances where the commissioner did not have probable cause to impose a civil penalty, the person charged may recover the person's costs and attorney fees from the department.

The commissioner shall transmit all money collected from civil penalties pursuant to this section to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Before imposing a civil penalty, the commissioner may consider the effect of the penalty on the ability of the person charged to stay in business.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 723, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-36-121 and 35-37-117 as they existed prior to 2020.

35-36-106. Penalties.

A person who violates section 35-36-217 (1)(a) to (1)(e) or (1)(j) or section 35-36-313 (1)(a) to (1)(e) commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401. A person who violates section 35-36-217 (1)(f) or 35-36-313 (1)(f) or (1)(j) commits theft, as defined in section 18-4-401. A person who violates section 35-36-217 (1)(l) or 35-36-313 (1)(k) commits fraud by check, as defined in section 18-5-205. A person who violates section 35-36-217 (1)(g) to (1)(i) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

A person who violates any other provision of this article 36 commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Civil suits and criminal prosecutions arising by virtue of this article 36 may be commenced and tried either in the county in which the commodities or farm products were received by the commodity handler, small-volume commodity handler, dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent, or in the county in which the principal place of business of the commodity handler, small-volume commodity handler, dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent is located, or in the county in which the violation of this article 36 occurred. The attorney general or the district attorney for the judicial district in which the violation of this article 36 occurs shall, upon the request of any enforcing officer or other interested person, prosecute the violation.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 723, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1) and (2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3279, § 632, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-36-124 and 35-37-119 as they existed prior to 2020.

35-36-107. Appeal.

Any action of the commissioner with reference to the administration of this article 36 may be reviewed by any court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to section 24-4-106 only after all administrative remedies have been exhausted.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 724, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-36-122 and 35-37-110 as they existed prior to 2020.

35-36-108. Report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 724, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 1, 2021. (See L. 2020, p. 724.)

35-36-109. Repeal of article.

This article 36 is repealed, effective September 1, 2025. Before the repeal, the licensing functions of the commissioner are scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 724, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 35-36-125 and 35-37-122 as they existed prior to 2020.